el: Μέθοδος κίνησης αντλίας λαδιού: Κίνηση μέσω εκκεντροφόρου; Κίνηση μέσω στροφαλοφόρου; Κίνηση μέσω γραναζιού διανομέα/βοηθητικού άξονα; Κίνηση μέσω ηλεκτροκινητήρα; Κίνηση μέσω ιμάντα χρονισμού; Κίνηση μέσω καδένας χρονισμού; Άλλο
tr: Yağ pompası tahrik yöntemi: Eksantrik mili tahrikli; Krank mili tahrikli; Distribütör/yardımcı mil dişlisi tahrikli; Elektrik motoru tahrikli; Triger kayışı tahrikli; Eksantrik zinciri tahrikli; Diğer
pt-BR: Bomba de óleo método de acionamento: Acionado por eixo de comando de válvulas; Acionado pelo virabrequim; Acionado por engrenagem do distribuidor/eixo auxiliar; Acionado por motor elétrico; Acionado por correia dentada; Acionado por corrente de distribuição; Outro
fi: Öljypumpun käyttötapa: Nokka-akselivetoinen; Kampiakselivetoinen; Virranjakajan / apuakselin hammaspyörävetoinen; Sähkömoottorivetoinen; Jakohihnavetoinen; Jakoketjuvetoinen; Muu
lt-LT: Alyvos siurblio pavaros metodas: Varoma paskirstymo velenu; Varoma alkūniniu velenu; Varoma skirstytuvo / pagalbinio veleno pavara; Varoma elektriniu varikliu; Varoma paskirstymo diržu; Varoma paskirstymo grandine; Kita
pl: Metoda napędu pompy olejowej: Napęd z wałka rozrządu; Napęd z wału korbowego; Napęd przez zębatkę wałka rozdzielacza/pomocniczego; Napęd silnikiem elektrycznym; Napęd paskiem rozrządu; Napęd łańcuchem rozrządu; Inna
sk-SK: Metóda pohonu olejového čerpadla: Poháňané vačkovým hriadeľom; Poháňané kľukovým hriadeľom; Poháňané prevodom rozdeľovača/pomocného hriadeľa; Poháňané elektromotorom; Poháňané rozvodovým remeňom; Poháňané rozvodovou reťazou; Iné
it: Metodo di azionamento della pompa dell'olio: Azionato dall'albero a camme; Azionata dall'albero motore; Azionata da ingranaggio spinterogeno/albero ausiliario; Azionata da motore elettrico; Azionata dalla cinghia di distribuzione; Azionata dalla catena di distribuzione; Altro
es: Método de accionamiento de la bomba de aceite: Impulsado por árbol de levas; Impulsado por cigüeñal; Impulsado por engranaje del eje del distribuidor/auxiliar; Impulsado por motor eléctrico; Impulsado por correa de distribución; Impulsado por cadena de distribución; Otro
en: Oil pump drive method: Camshaft driven; Crankshaft driven; Distributor/auxiliary shaft gear driven; Electric motor driven; Timing belt driven; Timing chain driven; Other
pt-PT: método de acionamento da bomba de óleo: Acionado por árvore de cames; Acionado por cambota; Acionado por engrenagem do distribuidor/veio auxiliar; Acionado por motor elétrico; Acionado por correia de distribuição; Acionado por corrente de distribuição; Outro
ko: 오일 펌프 구동 방법: 캠샤프트 구동; 크랭크샤프트 구동; 디스트리뷰터/보조 샤프트 기어 구동; 전기 모터 구동; 타이밍 벨트 구동; 타이밍 체인 구동; 기타
fr: Mode d’entraînement de la pompe à huile: Entraînement par arbre à cames; Entraînement par vilebrequin; Entraînement par engrenage d'allumeur/arbre auxiliaire; Entraînement par moteur électrique; Entraînement par courroie de distribution; Entraînement par chaîne de distribution; Autre
th: วิธีการขับเคลื่อนปั๊มน้ำมัน: ขับเคลื่อนด้วยเพลาลูกเบี้ยว; ขับเคลื่อนด้วยเพลาข้อเหวี่ยง; ขับเคลื่อนด้วยเกียร์เพลาจ่ายไฟ/เพลารอง; ขับเคลื่อนด้วยมอเตอร์ไฟฟ้า; ขับเคลื่อนด้วยสายพานไทม์มิ่ง; ขับเคลื่อนด้วยโซ่ไทม์มิ่ง; อื่นๆ
nb: Drivsystem for oljepumpe: Kamakseldrevet; Veivakseldrevet; Fordeler-/hjelpeakseldrevet; Elektrisk motordrevet; Tannreimdrevet; Registerkjededrevet; Annet
cs: Způsob pohonu olejového čerpadla: Poháněno vačkovým hřídelem; Poháněno klikovým hřídelem; Poháněno rozdělovačem / pomocnou hřídelí; Poháněno elektromotorem; Poháněno rozvodovým řemenem; Poháněno rozvodovým řetězem; Ostatní
sv: Drivmetod för oljepump: Kamaxeldriven; Vevaxeldriven; Driven via fördelare/hjälpaxel; Elmotordriven; Kamremsdriven; Kamkedjedriven; Övrigt
bg-BG: Метод за задвижване на маслена помпа: Задвижвана от разпределителния вал; Задвижвана от коляновия вал; Задвижвана от делко/спомагателен вал; Задвижвана от електромотор; Задвижвана от ангренажен ремък; Задвижвана от ангренажна верига; Друго
hu: Olajszivattyú meghajtási módja: Vezérműtengely-hajtású; Főtengely-hajtású; Elosztó / segédtengely fogaskerék-hajtású; Villanymotor-hajtású; Vezérműszíj-hajtású; Vezérműlánc-hajtású; Egyéb
zh-TW: 機油泵浦驅動方式: 凸輪軸驅動; 曲軸驅動; 分電盤/輔助軸齒輪驅動; 電動馬達驅動; 正時皮帶驅動; 正時鏈條驅動; 其他
vi: Phương pháp dẫn động bơm dầu: Dẫn động bằng trục cam; Dẫn động bằng trục khuỷu; Dẫn động bằng bộ chia điện/bánh răng trục phụ; Dẫn động bằng động cơ điện; Dẫn động bằng dây curoa cam; Dẫn động bằng sên cam; Khác
zh-CN: 机油泵驱动方式: 凸轮轴驱动; 曲轴驱动; 分电器/辅助轴齿轮驱动; 电机驱动; 正时皮带驱动; 正时链条驱动; 其他
nl: Oliepomp aandrijfmethode: Aangedreven door nokkenas; Aangedreven door krukas; Aangedreven door verdeler-/hulpastandwiel; Aangedreven door elektromotor; Aangedreven door distributieriem; Aangedreven door distributieketting; Overig
ja: オイルポンプ駆動方式: カムシャフト駆動; クランクシャフト駆動; ディストリビューター/補助シャフトギア駆動; 電動モーター駆動; タイミングベルト駆動; タイミングチェーン駆動; その他
ru: Способ привода масляного насоса: Привод от распредвала; Привод от коленвала; Привод от распределителя / промежуточного вала; Привод от электромотора; Привод от ремня ГРМ; Привод от цепи ГРМ; Другое
sl-SI: Način pogona oljne črpalke: Pogon na odmično gred; Pogon na ročično gred; Pogon z zobnikom razdelilnika/pomožne gredi; Pogon na elektromotor; Pogon na zobati jermen; Pogon na krmilno verigo; Drugo
hr-HR: Metoda pogona uljne pumpe: Pogonjen bregastom osovinom; Pogonjen radilicom; Pogonjen razvodnikom / zupčanikom pomoćne osovine; Pogonjen elektromotorom; Pogonjen zupčastim remenom; Pogonjen razvodnim lancem; Ostalo
ro-RO: Metoda de acționare a pompei de ulei: Acționat de axul cu came; Acționat de arborele cotit; Acționat de angrenajul distribuitorului/axului auxiliar; Acționat de motor electric; Acționat de cureaua de distribuție; Acționat de lanțul de distribuție; Altele
de: Antriebsmethode der Ölpumpe: Nockenwellengetrieben; Kurbelwellengetrieben; Über Zündverteiler-/Nebenwellenzahnrad getrieben; Elektromotorgetrieben; Zahnriemengetrieben; Steuerkettengetrieben; Andere
da: Drivmetode for oliepumpe: Knastakseldrevet; Krumtapakseldrevet; Drevet af strømfordeler/hjælpeaksel; Drevet af elmotor; Tandremdrevet; Knastkædedrevet; Andet